Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-749
Administration of act; compliance with other laws.

In the administration of the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act, all actions of the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment, the Chief Water Officer, and the districts shall be consistent with the provisions of section 46-613.

Laws 1975, LB 577, § 16;

Laws 1984, LB 1071, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-671;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 71;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 217;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 46-656.65;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 89;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 43;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 242.